Indiana, session 2026, HB1334.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-11-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.125-2005,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Upon:
(1) issuance; and
(2) each renewal;
of a policy, an insurer may shall provide to an insured in electronic or
paper form a directory of providers with which the insurer has entered
into an agreement under section 3 of this chapter. The insurer shall
also provide the directory of providers to a prospective insured
upon request.
(b) An insurer that provides a directory described in subsection (a)
shall:
(1) inform the insured or prospective insured that the insured or
prospective insured may request the a directory described in
subsection (a) in paper form; and
(2) provide the directory in paper form upon the request of the
insured or prospective insured.
2026 IN 1334—LS 7019/DI 141


(c) A directory described in subsection (a) must include every
provider that has entered into an agreement with the insurer under
section 3 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 27-13-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.125-2005,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Upon:
(1) the enrollment; and
(2) each reenrollment;
of a subscriber, a health maintenance organization must provide to the
subscriber in electronic or paper form a list of providers who provide
health care services through the health maintenance organization. The
health maintenance organization must also provide the list of providers
in electronic or paper form to a potential enrollee upon request.
(b) A health maintenance organization shall:
(1) inform a subscriber or potential enrollee that the subscriber or
potential enrollee may request a list described in subsection (a) in
paper form; and
(2) provide the list in paper form upon the request of the
subscriber or potential enrollee.
(c) A list described in subsection (a) must include every provider
who provides health care services through the health maintenance
organization.
2026 IN 1334—LS 7019/DI 141